Maryland, session 2025, HB1409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle, it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(c) (12) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “MEDICAL CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
1. A FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 19–343 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; OR
2. AN ALZHEIMER’S SPECIAL CARE UNIT OR PROGRAM
AS DEFINED IN § 20–109 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(II) IT IS LAWFUL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A PERSON TO
INTERCEPT A WIRE, ORAL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION IN A MEDICAL CARE
FACILITY IF THE PERSON:
1. IS A RESIDENT OF THE MEDICAL CARE FACILITY OR
THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF A RESIDENT;
2. CONDUCTS THE ELECTRONIC MONITORING ONLY IN
THE RESIDENT’S ROOM IN THE MEDICAL CARE FACILITY;

HOUSE BILL 1409 3
3. RECEIVED PERMISSION FROM ALL ROOMMATES OF
THE RESIDENT, IF APPLICABLE; AND
4. POSTS A NOTICE ON THE DOOR OF THE RESIDENT’S
ROOM STATING THAT THE ROOM IS BEING MONITORED BY AN ELECTRONIC
MONITORING DEVICE.
Article – Health – General
19–343.
(a) In this section and §§ 19–344, 19–345, 19–345.1, 19–345.2, and 19–345.3 of
this subtitle, “facility” means a related institution that, under the rules and regulations of
the Department, is a comprehensive care facility or an extended care facility.
(b) (1) The General Assembly intends to promote the interests and well–being
of each resident of a facility.
(2) It is the policy of this State that, in addition to any other rights, each
resident of a facility has the following basic rights:
(i) The right to be treated with consideration, respect, and full
recognition of human dignity and individuality;
(ii) The right to receive treatment, care, and services that are
adequate, appropriate, and in compliance with relevant State and federal laws, rules, and
regulations;
(iii) The right to privacy;
(iv) The right to be free from mental and physical abuse;
(v) The right to notice, procedural fairness, and humane treatment
when being transferred or discharged from a facility;
(vi) The right to participate in decision making regarding transitions
in care, including a transfer or discharge from a facility;
(vii) The right to expect and receive appropriate assessment,
management, and treatment of pain as an integral component of the patient’s care;
(viii) The right to be free from physical and chemical restraints, except
for restraints that a physician authorizes for a clearly indicated medical need;
(ix) The right to receive respect and privacy in a medical care
program; and

HOUSE BILL 1409
(x) The right to manage personal financial affairs.
(c) Each facility shall:
(1) Post, conspicuously in a public place, the policy set forth in subsection
(b) of this section and the provisions in §§ 19–344(b) through (m), 19–345, and 19–346(i)(2)
of this subtitle;
(2) Give a copy of the policy and those provisions:
(i) On admission, to the resident;
(ii) To the guardian, next of kin, or sponsoring agency of the resident;
and
(iii) To a representative payee of the resident;
(3) Keep a receipt for the copy that is signed by the person who received
the copy; [and]
(4) Provide appropriate staff training to carry out the policy and those
provisions; AND
(5) ENSURE THAT A NOTICE OF THE PRESENCE OF AN ELECTRONIC
MONITORING DEVICE IS POSTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–402(C)(12) OF THE
COURTS ARTICLE.
19–343.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ELECTRONIC MONITORING DEVICE” MEANS:
1. A VIDEO SURVEILLANCE CAMERA; OR
2. A MICROPHONE OR OTHER DEVICE THAT CAPTURES
AUDIO.
(II) “ELECTRONIC MONITORING DEVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A DEVICE THAT IS SPECIFICALLY INTENDED TO
CAPTURE WIRE, ELECTRONIC, OR ORAL COMMUNICATION WITHOUT NOTICE TO OR
THE CONSENT OF A PARTY TO THE COMMUNICATIONS; OR

HOUSE BILL 1409 5
2. A DEVICE THAT IS CONNECTED TO THE INTERNET OR
THAT IS DESIGNED TO TRANSMIT DATA VIA AN ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION.
(3) “LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
LEGALLY AUTHORIZED TO MAKE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS ON BEHALF OF ANOTHER
INDIVIDUAL.
(4) “MEDICAL CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
(I) A FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 19–343 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(II) AN ALZHEIMER’S SPECIAL CARE UNIT OR PROGRAM AS
DEFINED IN § 20–109 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY SHALL ALLOW A RESIDENT OR THE
LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF A RESIDENT TO MONITOR THE RESIDENT THROUGH
THE USE OF AN ELECTRONIC MONITORING DEVICE.
(2) A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY SHALL REQUIRE A RESIDENT OR THE
LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF A RESIDENT WHO ENGAGES IN ELECTRONIC
MONITORING TO POST A NOTICE ON THE DOOR OF THE RESIDENT’S ROOM THAT
STATES THAT THE ROOM IS BEING MONITORED BY AN ELECTRONIC MONITORING
DEVICE.
(3) BEFORE ALLOWING A RESIDENT OR A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE
OF A RESIDENT TO BEGIN ELECTRONIC MONITORING, A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY
SHALL REQUIRE THE RESIDENT OR THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RESIDENT
WHO WISHES TO ENGAGE IN ELECTRONIC MONITORING TO OBTAIN THE WRITTEN
CONSENT FROM ALL OTHER RESIDENTS WHO SHARE THE ROOM OR THE LEGAL
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE OTHER RESIDENTS.
(4) ELECTRONIC MONITORING CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(I) BE NONCOMPULSORY AND AT THE ELECTION OF THE
RESIDENT OR LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RESIDENT;
(II) BE FUNDED BY THE RESIDENT OR LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE
OF THE RESIDENT; AND
(III) PROTECT THE PRIVACY RIGHTS OF OTHER RESIDENTS AND
VISITORS TO THE MEDICAL CARE FACILITY TO THE EXTENT REASONABLY POSSIBLE.

HOUSE BILL 1409
(5) A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY MAY NOT REFUSE TO ADMIT AN
INDIVIDUAL TO RESIDENCY IN THE MEDICAL CARE FACILITY OR REMOVE A
RESIDENT FROM THE MEDICAL CARE FACILITY BECAUSE OF A REQUEST FOR
ELECTRONIC MONITORING.
(6) A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY SHALL MAKE REASONABLE PHYSICAL
ACCOMMODATION FOR ELECTRONIC MONITORING, BY PROVIDING:
(I) A REASONABLY SECURE PLACE TO MOUNT AN ELECTRONIC
MONITORING DEVICE; AND
(II) ACCESS TO A POWER SOURCE FOR AN ELECTRONIC
MONITORING DEVICE.
(7) A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY SHALL INFORM A RESIDENT OR THE
LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RESIDENT OF THE RESIDENT’S RIGHT TO ENGAGE
IN ELECTRONIC MONITORING.
(8) A MEDICAL CARE FACILITY MAY REQUEST A RESIDENT OR THE
LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF A RESIDENT TO CONDUCT ELECTRONIC MONITORING
WITHIN PLAIN VIEW.
(C) AN ADMINISTRATOR OF THE MEDICAL CARE FACILITY MAY REQUIRE
THAT A RESIDENT OR THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF A RESIDENT WHO WISHES TO
INSTALL AN ELECTRONIC MONITORING DEVICE MAKE THE REQUEST IN WRITING.
(D) SUBJECT TO THE MARYLAND RULES OF EVIDENCE, A RECORDING
CREATED THROUGH THE USE OF ELECTRONIC MONITORING ENGAGED IN UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN EITHER A CIVIL OR CRIMINAL ACTION
BROUGHT IN A MARYLAND COURT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.